Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 4. Probation and Parole Generally
§ 7-13-408.
Probation, parole and conditional release administrative jail or adult community correction program sanction and revocation hearing procedures.

The probation and parole agent shall notify the department and the board or the appropriate court if it is determined consideration should be given to retaking or reincarcerating a person under the supervision of the department who has violated a condition of his probation, parole or other conditional release and is subject to revocation of supervision. Prior to notification, a hearing shall be held in accordance with this section within a reasonable time, unless a hearing is waived by the probationer, parolee or conditional releasee. In the case of a parolee for whom the violation is based on a new felony conviction, a preliminary hearing is not required under this section. In the case of a probationer, the hearing is only required when the probationer has been reincarcerated and a legal warrant has not been obtained within ten (10) days. As soon as practicable, following termination of any hearing, the appropriate officer or agent shall report to the department and the court or board, furnish a copy of the hearing record, report on the prior use of incentives and sanctions under W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

for the probationer, parolee or conditional releasee and make recommendations regarding the disposition to be made of the probationer, parolee or conditional releasee. Compliance violations not leading to retaking or reincarceration shall be sanctioned under W.S.

7-13-1801

and

7-13-1802

. Pending any proceeding pursuant to this section, the appropriate agent may take custody of and detain the probationer, parolee or conditional releasee involved for a reasonable period of time prior to the hearing. If it appears to the hearing officer or agent that retaking or reincarceration is likely to follow, the agent may take custody of and detain the probationer, parolee or conditional releasee for a reasonable period after the hearing or waiver as may be necessary to arrange for the retaking or reincarceration.

Any hearing pursuant to this section or W.S.

7-13-1803

may be before the field services administrator, his designated hearing officer or any other person authorized pursuant to the laws of this state to hear cases of alleged probation, parole or conditional release violations, except that no hearing officer shall be the person making the allegation of violation. In cases of alleged parole violations by persons who were paroled by the board, hearings pursuant to this section shall be before the executive director of the board or his designated hearing officer.

With respect to any hearing pursuant to this section, the probationer, parolee or conditional releasee:

Shall have reasonable notice in writing of the nature and content of the allegations to be made including notice that the purpose of the hearing is to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that he has committed a violation that may lead to a revocation of probation, parole or conditional release;

Shall be permitted to consult with any persons whose assistance he reasonably desires, prior to the hearing;

Shall have the right to confront and examine any person who has made allegations against him, unless the hearing officer determines that the confrontation would present a substantial present or subsequent danger of harm to the person;

May admit, deny or explain the violation alleged and may present proof, including affidavits and other evidence, in support of his contentions.

A record of the proceedings under this section shall be made and preserved either by stenographic means or through the use of a recording machine.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 116, § 3.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 35, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-331.1; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-409

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2005, ch. 55, § 1; 2008, ch. 14, § 1; 2011, ch. 30, § 1; 2018 ch. 75, § 1, effective March 12, 2018; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 116, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to state probation and parole officer, see § 7-13-405(b).

As to procedure in regard to revocation of probation, see Rule 39(a), W.R.Cr.P.

The 2005 amendment

added the last sentence in (b).

Laws 2005, ch. 55, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added (e).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), deleted “state” preceding “probation” near the beginning, substituted “agent” for “officer,” and inserted the present third and fourth sentences; and in (b) substituted “field services administrator” for “state probation and parole officer.”

The 2018 amendment,

in (e), added “or as an alternative to revocation of the probation of any probationer who has violated a condition of his probation” and inserted “and probationers” following “Parolees” in the second sentence.

Laws 2018, ch. 75, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2018.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 116 § 2, effective July 1, 2019, in (a), added "and is subject to revocation of supervision" following "conditional release" in the first sentence, added "report on the prior use of incentives and sanctions under W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

for the probationer, parolee or conditional releasee" following "hearing record" in the fifth sentence, and added the sixth sentence; and in (b), added "or W.S.

7-13-1803

" following "this section" in the first sentence.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 116 § 3, repealed (e), which read: "The department may establish by rule and regulation a system of imposing the administrative sanctions specified in W.S. 7-13-1107(b) as an alternative to revocation of the parole of any parolee who has violated a condition of his parole or as an alternative to revocation of the probation of any probationer who has violated a condition of his probation. Parolees and probationers committed to the county jail or a residential community correctional program pursuant to this subsection shall be housed in accordance with W.S. 7-13-1107(c) or 7-18-115(b)."

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Section held not mandatory. —

See Knobel v. State, 576 P.2d 941,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1978).

And failure to hold preliminary hearing not denial of due process. —

One is not denied due process where there is a failure to hold a separate preliminary or probable-cause hearing prior to the final probation revocation hearing. Knobel v. State, 576 P.2d 941,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1978).

Applicability of section. —

This section applies to cases wherein the probation or parole agent seeks to have the probationer retaken or reincarcerated for violation of the terms of his probation or conditional release, and has no application unless such proceedings are instituted by the department. It is in no manner applicable to a proceeding instituted by the county attorney's office. Knobel v. State, 576 P.2d 941,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1978).

This section can be applicable only where the department initiates and conducts the final revocation proceeding. Weisser v. State, 600 P.2d 1320,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 469

(Wyo. 1979).

The protections articulated in this section are intended to apply in administrative revocation proceedings but, by decisions of the supreme court, they have been extended, with the exception of the separate preliminary hearing requirement, to proceedings in which the court acts on a petition for revocation filed by a county attorney or the board of probation and parole. Swackhammer v. State, 808 P.2d 219,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1991).

Rule 39 supersedes this section. —

The present text of the probation revocation rule, W.R.Cr.P. 39, is definitely structured to intentionally require initial involvement of the county or district attorney for the practice of law function intrinsically involved in judicial probation termination proceedings; therefore, this section for judicial revocation proceedings in probation cases and its process of notice or arrest based on the issuance of a bench warrant is superseded by W.R.Cr.P. 39. Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992), overruled in part, Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002).

Applied

in

Mason v. State, 631 P.2d 1051,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 363

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Hewitt v. State, 835 P.2d 348,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1992); Cooney v. White, 845 P.2d 353,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility, in state probation revocation proceedings, of evidence obtained through illegal search and seizure, 77 ALR3d 636.

Admissibility, in state probation revocation proceedings, of incriminating statement obtained in violation of Miranda rule, 77 ALR3d 669.

Admissibility of hearsay evidence in probation revocation hearings, 11 ALR4th 999.

Power of court, after expiration of probation term, to revoke or modify probation for violations committed during the probation term, 13 ALR4th 1240.

Power of court to revoke probation for acts committed after imposition of sentence but prior to commencement of probation term, 22 ALR4th 755.

Revocation of probation based on defendant's misrepresentation or concealment of information from trial court, 36 ALR4th 1182.

Probation revocation: insanity as defense, 56 ALR4th 1178.

Determination that state failed to prove charges relied upon for revocation of probation as barring subsequent criminal action based on same underlying charges, 2 ALR5th 262.

Who may institute proceedings to revoke probation, 21 ALR5th 275.

Sufficiency of hearsay evidence in probation revocation hearings. 21 A.L.R.6th 771.

§ 7-13-409.
Disclosure of information and data.

All information and data obtained in the discharge of official duties by probation and parole agents is privileged information and shall not be disclosed directly or indirectly to anyone other than to the judge, the department or to others entitled to receive reports unless and until otherwise ordered by the judge, board or department.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 35, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-331.2; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-410

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

No error in denying defendant access to data. —

Since a criminal defendant has no right to examine the files and records of the department in connection with a sentencing hearing, but is only entitled to a disclosure of all of the material contained in the presentence report and any other information that is known to the trial court with respect to sentencing, the court committed no error in denying the defendant access to the records of any prior probation supervision or notes taken by any probation and parole agent to prepare the presentence report. Alexander v. State, 823 P.2d 1198,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1992).

Report did not improperly contain confidential information. —

Presentence investigation report under the Addicted Offender Accountability Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-13-1301

et seq., did not improperly contain confidential information because the information contained the in the evaluator's report to the probation and parole officer, which related directly to defendant's propensity for violence, was meant to be related to the district court as it was indispensable in deciding whether treatment options should be considered as part of any sentence.
Janpol v. State, 2008 WY 21, 178 P.3d 396,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2008).

Privilege not to be revoked. —

Defendant could not circumvent the statutory privilege of this section by demanding that the information be given to him pursuant to Rule 16, W.R.Cr.P. Roach v. State, 901 P.2d 1135,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Montoya v. State, 971 P.2d 134,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1998).

Quoted in

Williams v. Tharp, 2017 WY 8, 388 P.3d 513,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Availability of discovery at probation revocation hearings, 52 ALR5th 559.

§ 7-13-410.
Notice of probation order; request for probation supervision or report.

The clerk of the court granting probation to a person convicted of a crime shall send a certified copy of the order to the department of corrections or, in the case of a juvenile, to the department of family services.

At the time of granting probation or at any later time, the court may request the department to provide supervision of the probationer. The probation and parole agents will not be required to supervise or report on a person granted probation unless requested to do so by the court granting probation. The court shall not request supervised probation for a misdemeanor offense unless the court makes findings showing a particular need for supervision of the offender.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 20, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 7-333; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-411

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 2011, ch. 30, § 1; 2014 ch. 5, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to state probation and parole officer, see § 7-13-405(b).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “department of corrections” for “state probation and parole officer” and “juvenile” for “minor.”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added the last sentence in (b).

§ 7-13-411.
Apprehension of violators.

A probation and parole agent may, in the performance of his duties:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 30, § 2.

Request a peace officer to arrest without warrant any probationer or parolee if the probation and parole agent has probable cause to believe the person has violated the conditions of his probation or parole. A person arrested under this paragraph may be detained for a reasonable period of time until a legal warrant is obtained or pending further proceedings under W.S.

7-13-408

.

A peace officer may arrest without warrant an alleged probation or parole violator after receiving a written statement from a probation and parole agent setting forth that the probationer or parolee has, in the judgment of the probation and parole agent, violated the conditions of his probation or parole. A peace officer may also arrest without warrant an alleged probation or parole violator at any time the peace officer has probable cause to believe the probationer or parolee has violated the conditions of his probation or parole. A person arrested under this subsection may be detained for a reasonable period of time until a legal warrant is obtained or pending further proceedings under W.S.

7-13-408

.

A peace officer may take into custody and hold a person granted parole or on probation from another state when requested to do so by the probation and parole agent or the proper authorities from the other state.

A parole or probation violator apprehended shall be accepted and held in the county jail at the request of the probation and parole agent.

Any expense incurred in holding a parolee in county jail at the request of a probation and parole agent or pending proceedings under W.S.

7-13-408

, including costs of shelter, food, clothing, and necessary medical, dental and hospital care and any expense for transporting the parolee shall be paid by the department unless there are local charges pending. The per diem cost of holding parolees under this section shall be agreed upon by the sheriff and the department, but shall not exceed the amount established by the department based on funds appropriated to the department for housing of offenders.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 20, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 7-334; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-412

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1995, ch. 122, § 2; 2011, ch. 30, §§ 1, 2; 2014 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to arrests without warrant by peace officers, see §

7-2-103

.

As to state probation and parole officer, see § 7-13-405(b).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (a)(i) and (a)(ii) which read: “(i) Exercise the powers of arrest provided by W.S.

7-2-102

and 7-2-103(a); (ii) Take into custody any parolee at the request of the board, the state probation and parole officer or the department of family services in the case of a minor and detain the person for a reasonable period of time pending further proceedings under W.S.

7-13-408

”; in (a)(iii), inserted “probation and parole,” and substituted “conditions” for “terms” in the first sentence; in (c), deleted “or probation and parole agent” following “A peace officer,” and inserted “probation and parole agent or the”; in (d), deleted “by a probation and parole agent” following “violator apprehended,” and inserted “probation and parole”; and in (e), substituted “but” for “and” in the last sentence, and “amount established by the department based on funds appropriated to the department for housing of offenders” for “per diem cost of housing an inmate at the Wyoming state penitentiary,” and made stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “Request a peace officer to a” in (a)(iii).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted the present second sentence.

§ 7-13-412.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 2, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to provision relating to contents of warrant of extradition of parolees, see §

7-3-205

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1947, ch. 20, § 13, related to applicability of the interstate compact.

Laws 2009, ch. 2, § 1 makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 17, 2009.

§ 7-13-413.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 2, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to provision relating to contents of warrant of extradition of parolees, see §

7-3-205

.§ 7-13-405(b).

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1939, ch. 34, § 1, related to interstate compact for supervision of parolees and probationers.

Laws 2009, ch. 2, § 1 makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 17, 2009.

§ 7-13-414.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 2, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to provision relating to contents of warrant of extradition of parolees, see §

7-3-205

.§ 7-13-405(b).

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1975, ch. 34, § 1, related to notification under interstate compact of retaking or reincarceration.

Laws 2009, ch. 2, § 1 makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 17, 2009.

§ 7-13-415.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 2, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to provision relating to contents of warrant of extradition of parolees, see §

7-3-205

.§ 7-13-405(b).

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1975, ch. 34, § 1, related to hearing officer under interstate compact.

Laws 2009, ch. 2, § 1 makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 17, 2009.

§ 7-13-416.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 2, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to provision relating to contents of warrant of extradition of parolees, see §

7-3-205

.§ 7-13-405(b).

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1975, ch. 34, § 1, related to hearing in another state under the interstate compact.

Laws 2009, ch. 2, § 1 makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 17, 2009.

§ 7-13-417.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 2, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to provision relating to contents of warrant of extradition of parolees, see §

7-3-205

.§ 7-13-405(b).

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1975, ch. 34, § 1, related to hearing in another state under the interstate compact.

Laws 2009, ch. 2, § 1 makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 17, 2009.

§ 7-13-418.
Selection, training and powers of local volunteer; compensation.

In order to further the objectives of W.S.

7-13-401

through

7-13-424

, the field services administrator may select, organize and train local volunteer citizens who, acting under his supervision, may:

Advise and assist probation and parole agents with special reference to vocational and technical education services for probationers and parolees;

Maintain liaison with all appropriate municipal, county, state and federal agencies whose services aid in the reintegration of offenders into society;

Assist in programs relating to the social, moral and psychological needs of persons released under probation and parole supervision;

Not receive compensation from the state. At the discretion of the field services administrator, however, volunteers may be reimbursed for necessary and actual expenses incurred in performing the duties described in this section.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 149, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-338.1; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-417

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2008, ch. 100, § 2; 2011, ch. 30, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to state probation and parole officer, see § 7-13-405(b).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “7-13-424” for “7-13-421” in the introductory language of (a).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (a) and in (a)(iv), substituted “field services administrator” for “state probation and parole officer.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 7-13-419.
Limitations on powers of volunteers.

Volunteers do not have power of arrest nor the right to execute criminal process.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 149, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-338.2; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-418

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to arrest generally, see chapter 8 of this title.

§ 7-13-420.
Good time allowances.

The governor, after consultation with the board and the department, shall adopt rules and regulations to establish a system of good time and special good time allowances for inmates of and parolees from any state penal institution, any institution which houses Wyoming inmates pursuant to W.S.

7-3-401

or any correctional facility operated pursuant to a contract with the state under W.S.

7-22-102

or inmates or parolees transferred to a community correctional facility pursuant to W.S.

7-18-109

or

7-18-115

. The rules may provide either for good time to be deducted from the maximum sentence or for good time to be deducted from the minimum sentence imposed by the sentencing court, or both, and may provide for the removal of previously earned good time allowances and the withholding of future good time allowances.

The rules and regulations adopted by the governor as provided by this section shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state but shall at all times be considered rules relating to the internal management of state penal institutions and not affecting private rights of inmates. The granting, refusal to grant, withholding or restoration of good time or special good time allowances to inmates shall be a matter of grace and not that of right of inmates.

The court may adjust the period of a probationer’s supervised probation on the recommendation of the probation and parole agent, which shall be based on the probationer’s positive progression towards the goals of the case plan as well as the overall compliance with the conditions imposed by the court.

The rules established under subsection (a) of this section shall:

Provide that good time may be awarded for time the sentencing court awards as jail credit in the judgment and sentence if the inmate or parolee would have otherwise received good time credit if the inmate or parolee had served that time in an institution eligible under subsection (a) of this section;

Provide that good time may be awarded for any time an inmate or parolee spends in custody from the date of sentencing until admission to an institution eligible under subsection (a) of this section;

Require the department to consult with the county sheriff to determine whether good time should be awarded to an inmate or parolee before awarding good time for jail credit under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-423

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 252, § 2; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2008, ch. 14, § 1; 2011, ch. 30, § 1; 2020 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to early parole for “good time,” see §

7-13-402

.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a), inserted “and parolees from,” inserted “or parolees,” added “or

7-18-115

” at the end of the first sentence, and added “and may provide for the removal of previously earned good time allowances and the withholding of future good time allowances” at the end.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (c).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (d).

Applicability of act. —

Laws 1991, ch. 252, § 3, provides: “The powers and authority set forth in this act shall be in addition to such other powers and authority as may presently exist under the laws of the state of Wyoming relating to correctional facilities or jails, and the requirements set forth in this act (including in particular, requirements relating to the obtaining of necessary consents and approvals) shall be deemed to apply only to actions taken or to be taken under authority of this act and shall not apply to any such other powers or authority as may presently exist under the laws of the state of Wyoming.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2020, ch. 28, § 2, provides: “(a) The provisions of this act shall apply only to:

“(i) Sentences of record that are active on the effective date of this act for all persons who are:

“(A) Sentenced for any crime and are awaiting transfer to a facility listed in W.S. 7-13-420(a);

“(B) Serving a sentence; or

“(C) On parole.

“(ii) Sentences of record for which a person is received by the department on or after the effective date of this act.”

Quoted

in

Duffy v. State, 789 P.2d 821,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1990); Jenkins v. State, 2002 WY 107, 49 P.3d 1028,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Duffy v. State, 730 P.2d 754,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 655

(Wyo. 1986); Trusky v. State, 7 P.3d 5,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 7-13-421.
Restitution as condition of parole.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 30, § 2.

The board shall provide for restitution in the amount determined by the court pursuant to W.S.

7-9-103

unless the board finds the parolee is not reasonably capable of making the payments, in which case the board may modify the amount of restitution to be paid, taking into account the factors enumerated in W.S.

7-9-106

.

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 30, § 2.

If the parolee fails to pay the restitution as provided by this section the board may:

Modify the amount of the restitution;

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 30, § 2.

Revoke the parole.

The board may waive the payment of some or all of the restitution as a condition of parole if it finds the payment of some or all of the restitution will work an undue hardship on the parolee or his family. Victims who have requested to receive notification pursuant to W.S. 1-40-204(f) of information authorized to be released pursuant to W.S. 1-40-204(d) shall be given notice and an opportunity to be heard prior to the board making a decision to waive some or all of the restitution under this subsection.

Nothing in this section shall limit or impair the rights of victims to sue and recover damages from the parolee in a civil action. However, any restitution payment by the parolee to a victim shall be set off against any judgment in favor of the victim in a civil action arising out of the same facts or event.

The fact that restitution was required or made under this section shall not be admissible as evidence in a civil action unless offered by the parolee.

In the event a victim is not satisfied with the restitution plan required or modified by the board, the victim’s exclusive remedies are a civil action against the parolee or execution on the restitution order pursuant to W.S. 7-9-103(d).

The board may require payment of the following obligations as conditions of parole if it finds the parolee is reasonably capable of making the payments, taking into account the factors enumerated in W.S. 7-9-106(a)(iii):

Support of dependents of the parolee;

Court ordered fines, reimbursement for the services of the public defender or court appointed counsel, the surcharge imposed under W.S.

1-40-119

and the surcharge imposed under W.S.

7-13-1616

;

Costs or partial costs of evaluations, treatment, services, programs or assistance the parolee is receiving;

Cost or partial costs of supervision of the parolee imposed under W.S. 7-13-1102(a)(iii).

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 27, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

7-13-423

; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

7-13-424

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2007, ch. 71, § 1; 2011, ch. 30, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2016 ch. 71, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to wrongful death action, see chapter 38 of title 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added the last sentence in (b) and (b)(i) through (iv).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (a), pertaining to definitions of criminal activity, pecuniary damage, restitution, and victim; repealed former (b)(i) through (b)(iv), pertaining to obligations as conditions of parole; repealed former (c)(ii), which read: “Extend the parole period to accommodate the parolee's ability to pay restitution; or”; in (d), substituted “Victims who have requested to receive notification pursuant to W.S. 1-40-204(f) of information authorized to be released pursuant to W.S. 1-40-204(d)” for “If the victim can be located through the exercise of reasonable diligence, he”; substituted “parolee” for “defendant” in throughout (e) and (f); in (g), substituted “required” for “approved,” and substituted “exclusive remedies are a civil action against the parolee or execution on the restitution order pursuant to W.S. 7-9-103(d)” for “sole and exclusive remedy is a civil action”; and added (h).

The 2012 amendment,

in (b), deleted “The board may require payment of the following obligations as conditions of parole if it finds the parolee is reasonably capable of making the payments, taking into account the factors enumerated in W.S. 7-9-106(a)(iii)” at the end.

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted “and” following “counsel” and inserted “and the surcharge imposed under
W.S.

7-13-1616

” in (h)(ii).

Absent statutory authority, sentencing court has no power to order restitution. —

Bishop v. State, 687 P.2d 242,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1984), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 1219, 105 S. Ct. 1203, 84 L. Ed. 2d 345, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 998 (U.S. 1985).

Statutes giving court power to order restitution. —

The correct reading of §§

7-9-102

and -103 and § 7-13-421(b), collectively, is that these statutes specifically authorize a sentencing court to impose restitution ordered a condition of parole unless the Board of Parole intervenes. Helmlinger v. State, 855 P.2d 363,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1993).

Parole board authority reviewed upon adverse decision. —

The defendant argued that subsection (c)(ii) of this section violated the separation of powers requirement in his case because that statute might have permitted the parole board to perform both legislative and judicial functions by allowing the board to extend the period of his possible parole in the event he failed to make restitution, because the board had not yet exercised its statutory authority; however, the issue raised was not ripe for review. The defendant could seek review when he could demonstrate that the board had made some adverse decision. Brenning v. State, 870 P.2d 349,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Keller v. State, 771 P.2d 379,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 7-13-422.
Short title.

This act may be cited as “The Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision.”

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 71, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, ch. 71, § 2, made the act effective the later of July 1, 2001, or upon enactment of the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision into law by the thirty-fifth jurisdiction. The compact was entered into by a 35th state on June 19, 2002.